src/verb-fin-morph.txt
! =====================
! LEXICA FOR VERB ROOTS
! =====================


! -----------
! Auxiliaries
! -----------

LEXICON neg
 +Ind:e indneg ;
 +Imp:%^Al impneg ;

LEXICON indneg
 +Sg1:%>n K ;
 +Sg2:%>t K ;
 +Sg3:%>i2 K ;
 +Pl1:%>mme K ;
 +Pl2:%>tte K ;
 +Pl3:%>i2v%^At K ;

LEXICON impneg
 +Sg2:%>%^A K ;
 +Sg3:%>k%^O%^On K ;
 +Pl1:%>k%^A%^Amme K ;
 +Pl2:%>k%^A%^Atte K ;
 +Pl3:%>k%^O%^Ot K ;


! -------------
! Regular verbs
! -------------

LEXICON 52
 +Ind+Prs:%> PN ;
 +Ind+Prt:%>i%> PN ;
 +Cond:%>isi PN ;
 +Pot:%>ne PN ;
 +Inf3:%>ma INF3 ;

LEXICON 53
52 ;
LEXICON 54
52 ;
LEXICON 55
52 ;
LEXICON 56
52 ;
LEXICON 57
52 ;
LEXICON 58
52 ;
LEXICON 59
52 ;
LEXICON 60
52 ;
LEXICON 61
52 ;
LEXICON 62
52 ;
LEXICON 63
 +Inf:%>d^A K ;
 +Ind+Prs:%> PN ;
 +Ind+Prt:%>i%> PN ;
 +Cond:%>isi PN ;
 +Pot:%>ne PN ;


LEXICON 64
52 ;
LEXICON 65
52 ;
LEXICON 66
52 ;
LEXICON 67
52 ;
LEXICON 68
52 ;
LEXICON 69
52 ;
LEXICON 70
52 ;
LEXICON 71
52 ;
LEXICON 72
52 ;
LEXICON 73
52 ;
LEXICON 74
52 ;
LEXICON 75
52 ;
LEXICON 76
52 ;


LEXICON PN
 +Sg1:%>X1n K ;
 +Sg2:%>X1t K ;
 +Sg3:%>%^V K ;
 +Pl1:%>X1mme K ;
 +Pl2:%>X1tte K ;
 +Pl3:%>v%^At K ;


LEXICON INF3
 +Ill:%>^An K ;
 +Ine:%>ss^A K ;
 +Ela:%>st^A K ;
 +Ade:%>ll^A K ;
 +Abe:%>tt^A K ;
